Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 5

Foreign Professional Limited Liability Companies

48-248-501. Foreign professional limited liability companies.

Except as provided in subsection (c), a foreign PLLC may not transact business in this state until it obtains a certificate of authority from the secretary of state.

A foreign PLLC may not register unless:

Its name satisfies the requirements of § 48-248-301;

It is organized for one (1) or more of the purposes referenced in and satisfies the requirements of § 48-248-104; and

All of its members, all of its governors (or their equivalent), if any, and all managers (or their equivalent) are licensed in one (1) or more states to render a professional service described in its articles; provided, that if the licensing authority of this state permits persons other than qualified persons to serve as governors, if any, or managers of a PLLC, not less than one half (½) of its governors, if any, and all managers except the secretary and treasurer, if any, of a PLLC shall be qualified persons with respect to the PLLC.

A foreign PLLC is not required to obtain a certificate of authority in this state unless it maintains or intends to maintain an office in this state for conduct of business or professional practice.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 94.

48-248-502. Application for a certificate of authority.

The application of a foreign PLLC for a certificate of authority in this state shall contain the information required in § 48-246-301; state it is a PLLC; state its purpose is to render specified professional services; and include a statement that the requirements of § 48-248-501(b)(3) are satisfied.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 95.

48-248-503. Revocation.

The secretary of state may administratively revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign PLLC authorized to transact business in this state if a licensing authority with jurisdiction over a professional service described in the PLLC's articles certifies to the secretary of state that the PLLC has violated or is violating a provision of this chapter and describes the violation in the certification.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-248-504. Offense — Penalty.

A person commits a Class B misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), if such person signs a document such person knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the licensing authority for filing.

The offense created by this section is in addition to any other offense created by law for the same conduct.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.